hr-HR: Sorta nara: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Black; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Ostalo
it: Varietà di melograno: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Nero; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Altro
sl-SI: Sorta granatnega jabolka: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Black; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Drugo
tr: Nar çeşidi: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Siyah; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Diğer
ja: ザクロの種類: アコ; エンジェルレッド; バグワ; 黒; エバースイート; ガネーシャ; カンダリ; モヤール・デ・エルチェ; パルフィアンカ; ワンダフル; その他
pt-PT: Variedade de romã: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Preto; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Outro
fi: Granaattiomenalajike: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Musta; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Muu
pt-BR: Romã variedade: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Preta; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Outros
fr: Variété de grenade: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Noir; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Autre
bg-BG: Сорт нар: Ако; Ейнджъл ред; Бхагва; Черен; Евърсуийт; Ганеш; Кандхари; Молар де елче; Парфианка; Уондърфул; Други
el: Ποικιλία ροδιού: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Μαύρο; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Άλλο
ro-RO: Varietate de rodie: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Black; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Altele
es: Variedad de granada: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Negro; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Otro
pl: Odmiana granatu: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Czarny; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Inne
vi: Giống lựu: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Màu đen; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Khác
de: Granatapfelsorte: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Schwarz; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Sonstige
th: พันธุ์ทับทิม: แอคโค; แองเจิลเรด; ภักวา; สีดำ; เอเวอร์สวีต; คเณศ; กันธารี; โมลลาร์ เด เอลเช; พาร์เฟียนกา; วันเดอร์ฟูล; อื่นๆ
da: Granatæblesort: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Sort; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Andet
zh-CN: 石榴品种: 阿科; 天使红; 巴格瓦; 黑色; 常甜; 甘尼许; 坎达里; 埃尔切莫拉尔; 帕菲安卡; 万得福; 其他
lt-LT: Granatų veislė: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Black; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Kita
zh-TW: 石榴品種: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; 黑色; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; 其他
ko: 석류 품종: 아코; 엔젤 레드; 바그와; 검정색; 에버스위트; 가네쉬; 칸다하리; 모야르 데 엘체; 파르피안카; 원더풀; 기타
cs: Odrůda granátového jablka: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Černá; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Jiné
hu: Gránátalmafajta: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Fekete; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Egyéb
sv: Granatäpplesort: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Svart; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Annat
sk-SK: Odroda granátového jablka: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Black; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Iné
nl: Granaatappel variëteit: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Zwart; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Overig
en: Pomegranate variety: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Black; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Other
nb: Granateplevariant: Acco; Angel Red; Bhagwa; Svart; Eversweet; Ganesh; Kandhari; Mollar de Elche; Parfianka; Wonderful; Annet
ru: Сорт граната: Акко; Энджел ред; Бхагва; Черный; Эверсвит; Ганеш; Кандахари; Моллар де Эльче; Парфянка; Уандерфул; Другое